Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Article 1. In General.

§ 65-1-1.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter and for the purposes of Sections 65-1-1 through 65-1-21, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Transportation. Whenever the term “Mississippi State Highway Department,” or the word “department” meaning the Mississippi State Highway Department, appears in the laws of the State of Mississippi, it shall mean the “Mississippi Department of Transportation.”

“Office” means an administrative subdivision of the department.

“Bureau” means an administrative subdivision of an office.

“Commission” means the Mississippi Transportation Commission. Whenever the term “Mississippi State Highway Commission,” or the word “commission” meaning the Mississippi State Highway Commission, appears in the laws of the State of Mississippi, it shall mean the Mississippi Transportation Commission.

“Executive Director” means the chief administrative officer of the department. Whenever the term “director,” meaning the Chief Administrative Officer of the State Highway Department, appears in the laws of the State of Mississippi, it shall mean the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

“Director” means the chief officer of an office.

“Administrator” means the chief officer of a bureau.

“Highway” or “road” includes rights-of-way, bridge and drainage structures, signs, guardrails and other structures made in connection with such highway or road.

“Construction” includes reconstruction.

“Maintenance” means the constant maintenance and repair to preserve a smooth surfaced highway.

“Pave” means to construct with a surface of either high-type or intermediate-type pavement.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5021; 1942, § 8053; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 30; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 65-1-2.
Mississippi Department of Transportation.

There is hereby created the Mississippi Department of Transportation, which shall include the following offices:

Office of Administrative Services.

Office of Highways.

Office of State Aid Road Construction.

Office of Intermodal Planning.

Office of Enforcement.

Each office shall be composed of such bureaus as deemed necessary by the executive director of the department.

The department is designated as the single state agency to receive and expend any funds made available by the United States Department of Transportation or any agency of the federal government for transportation purposes and to cooperate with federal, state, interstate and local agencies, organizations and persons performing activities relating to transportation. This subsection shall not apply to motor carrier safety assistance program funds made available by the federal government to the Public Service Commission.

The powers, duties and responsibilities of the State Highway Department with respect to the construction and maintenance of the state highway system are transferred to the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

The powers, duties and responsibilities of the Department of Economic and Community Development with respect to aeronautics are transferred to the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

The powers, duties and responsibilities of the State Tax Commission with respect to the weighing of motor vehicles along the highways of this state at inspection stations and by means of portable scales are transferred to the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

The powers, duties and responsibilities of the Department of Economic and Community Development with respect to transportation matters, except with respect to ports, are transferred to the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

The powers, duties and responsibilities of the State Aid Engineer and the Office of State Aid Road Construction are transferred to the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

All powers, duties and responsibilities of the Public Service Commission with regard to railroads, except rate-making authority, are transferred to the Mississippi Department of Transportation. The Mississippi Transportation Commission may perform any act and issue any rule, regulation or order which the commission is permitted to do by the Federal Railroad Safety Act of 1970 (45 USCS et seq.). A copy of any new rule, regulation or order passed by the Mississippi Transportation Commission shall be furnished to members of the Transportation Committees of the Mississippi House of Representatives and the Mississippi Senate. Individuals, corporations or companies affected by the order, rule or regulation shall be notified in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law.

All records, personnel, property and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocation or other funds of all those agencies, boards, commissions, departments, offices, bureaus and divisions that are transferred by Chapter 496, Laws, 1992, shall be transferred to the Mississippi Department of Transportation. The transfer of segregated or special funds shall be made in such a manner that the relation between program and revenue source as provided by law shall be retained.

From and after January 1, 1993, and until January 1, 1994, the Mississippi Department of Transportation and the Mississippi Transportation Commission shall be exempt from State Personnel Board procedures for the purpose of the employment, promotion, realignment, demotion, reprimand, suspension, termination, reallocation, reassignment, transfer, moving or relocation of personnel of all those agencies, boards, commissions, departments, offices, bureaus and divisions whose duties and responsibilities are transferred by Chapter 496, Laws, 1992, to the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 411, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 500, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1997).

§ 65-1-3.
Mississippi Transportation Commission.

There shall be a State Highway Commission which shall consist of three (3) members, one (1) from each of the three (3) Supreme Court Districts of the state. Only qualified electors who are citizens of the Supreme Court District in which he or she seeks election for five (5) years immediately preceding the day of the election shall be eligible for such office; however, the five-year citizen requirement shall apply to elections held from and after January 1, 2020.

On Tuesday after the first Monday in November of the year 1951, and every four (4) years thereafter, State Highway Commissioners shall be elected at the same time and in the same manner as the Governor is chosen; and the laws governing primary elections and the holding of general elections in this state shall apply to and govern the nomination and election of State Highway Commissioners. The State Highway Commissioners so elected shall enter upon the discharge of the duties of their respective offices on the first Monday of January in the year next succeeding the date of their election, and they shall serve for a term of four (4) years and until their successors shall have been duly elected and qualified.

If any one or more of the State Highway Commissioners elected under the provisions of this chapter shall die, resign or be removed from office, the Governor shall fill the vacancy by appointment for the unexpired term, provided such unexpired term shall not exceed twelve (12) months. If such unexpired term shall exceed twelve (12) months, the Governor shall, within fifteen (15) days from the date of such vacancy, by proclamation duly made, call an election in the Supreme Court District in which such vacancy exists, to be held within sixty (60) days from the date of the issuance of such proclamation, at which election a State Highway Commissioner shall be elected to fill such vacancy for the remaining portion of such unexpired term. Such special election shall be held in the manner provided for holding general elections in this state, as far as practicable.

Each of said State Highway Commissioners, before entering upon the discharge of the duties of his office, shall take and subscribe the oath of office required of other state officials and shall execute bond in the sum of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), with some surety company authorized to do business in this state as surety, conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of his office and for the faithful and true accounting of all funds or monies or property coming into his hands by virtue of his office, and conditioned further that all such funds, monies and property will be expended and used by him only for purposes authorized by law, said bond to be approved by the Governor or Attorney General and to be filed in the Office of the Secretary of State. The premium on such bonds shall be paid out of the funds of the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

From and after July 1, 1992, the State Highway Commission shall be the Mississippi Transportation Commission and the members thereof shall be the Mississippi Transportation Commissioners.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4989; 1942, § 8014; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1936, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1992; Laws, 2019, ch. 433, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 65-1-5.
Organization and meetings.

When the transportation commissioners enter upon the duties of their office, the Transportation Commission shall meet and organize by the election of one (1) of its members to serve as chairman of the commission for the four-year term for which the commissioner shall have been elected. The commission, a majority of which shall constitute a quorum, shall meet in regular session on the second Tuesday of each month at the office of the commission in Jackson, Mississippi; however, the commission may meet in regular session not more than three (3) times each year at such other location as may be set by the commission. At such regular sessions the commission may hear, continue and determine any and all matters coming before it. The commission may hold special sessions at the call of the executive director or the chairman at such times and places in this state as either of them may deem necessary. At such special sessions it may hear, continue, consider and determine any and all matters coming before it, provided that at least five (5) days’ notice of such meetings shall be given to all the members of the commission beforehand. A special session may be called at any time without the foregoing notice, or any notice, if by and with the unanimous consent of all the members of the commission, but such unanimous consent shall be spread at large on the minutes of the commission. If any session is held at a location other than at the commission’s office in Jackson, Mississippi, the commission shall make provisions to allow public participation in the meeting by appearing at the Jackson office.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall act as a legal entity, and shall only speak through its minutes, and in all matters shall act as a unit. Any action on the part of any member of the commission separately shall not bind the commission as a unit, but such individual member only shall be liable personally on his official bond.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall be a body corporate and as such may sue and be sued, plead and be impleaded, in any court of justice having jurisdiction of the subject matter of any such suit.In any suit against the Mississippi Transportation Commission service of process shall be had by serving the secretary of the commission with such process; and a copy of the declaration, petition or bill of complaint, or other initial pleading shall be handed the secretary along with the process.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4993; 1942, § 8018; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 5; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 4; Laws, 2004, ch. 337, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 19, 2004.).

§ 65-1-7.
Compensation of the commissioners.

The three (3) commissioners chosen as herein provided, and their successors, shall each receive as compensation for their services salaries fixed by the Legislature, and in addition shall be allowed all of their actual and necessary traveling and other expenses incurred in the performance of their respective official duties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4994; 1942, § 8019; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1932, ch. 133; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 6; Laws, 1952, ch. 335, § 4; Laws, 1958, ch. 336; Laws, 1966, ch. 445; Laws, 1974, ch. 402, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1974).

§ 65-1-8.
Authority and powers of the commission.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall have the following general powers, duties and responsibilities:

To coordinate and develop a comprehensive, balanced transportation policy for the State of Mississippi;

To promote the coordinated and efficient use of all available and future modes of transportation;

To make recommendations to the Legislature regarding alterations or modifications in any existing transportation policies;

To study means of encouraging travel and transportation of goods by the combination of motor vehicle and other modes of transportation;

To take such actions as are necessary and proper to discharge its duties pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 496, Laws of 1992, and any other provision of law;

To receive and provide for the expenditure of any funds made available to it by the Legislature, the federal government or any other source.

In addition to the general powers, duties and responsibilities listed in subsection (1) of this section, the Mississippi Transportation Commission shall have the following specific powers:

To make rules and regulations whereby the Transportation Department shall change or relocate any and all highways herein or hereafter fixed as constituting a part of the state highway system, as may be deemed necessary or economical in the construction or maintenance thereof; to acquire by gift, purchase, condemnation or otherwise, land or other property whatsoever that may be necessary for a state highway system as herein provided, with full consideration to be given to the stimulation of local public and private investment when acquiring such property in the vicinity of Mississippi towns, cities and population centers;

To enforce by mandamus, or other proper legal remedies, all legal rights or rights of action of the Mississippi Transportation Commission with other public bodies, corporations or persons;

To make and publish rules, regulations and ordinances for the control of and the policing of the traffic on the state highways, and to prevent their abuse by any or all persons, natural or artificial, by trucks, tractors, trailers or any other heavy or destructive vehicles or machines, or by any other means whatsoever, by establishing weights of loads or of vehicles, types of tires, width of tire surfaces, length and width of vehicles, with reasonable variations to meet approximate weather conditions, and all other proper police and protective regulations, and to provide ample means for the enforcement of same. The violation of any of the rules, regulations or ordinances so prescribed by the commission shall constitute a misdemeanor. No rule, regulation or ordinance shall be made that conflicts with any statute now in force or which may hereafter be enacted, or with any ordinance of municipalities. A monthly publication giving general information to the boards of supervisors, employees and the public may be issued under such rules and regulations as the commission may determine;

To give suitable numbers to highways and to change the number of any highway that shall become a part of the state highway system. However, nothing herein shall authorize the number of any highway to be changed so as to conflict with any designation thereof as a U.S. numbered highway. Where, by a specific act of the Legislature, the commission has been directed to give a certain number to a highway, the commission shall not have the authority to change such number;

To make proper and reasonable rules, regulations, and ordinances for the placing, erection, removal or relocation of telephone, telegraph or other poles, signboards, fences, gas, water, sewerage, oil or other pipelines, and other obstructions that may, in the opinion of the commission, contribute to the hazards upon any of the state highways, or in any way interfere with the ordinary travel upon such highways, or the construction, reconstruction or maintenance thereof, and to make reasonable rules and regulations for the proper control thereof. Any violation of such rules or regulations or noncompliance with such ordinances shall constitute a misdemeanor;

Except as otherwise provided for in this paragraph, whenever the order of the commission shall require the removal of, or other changes in the location of telephone, telegraph or other poles, signboards, gas, water, sewerage, oil or other pipelines; or other similar obstructions on the right-of-way or such other places where removal is required by law, the owners thereof shall at their own expense move or change the same to conform to the order of the commission. Any violation of such rules or regulations or noncompliance with such orders shall constitute a misdemeanor;

Rural water districts, rural water systems, nonprofit water associations and municipal public water systems in municipalities with a population of ten thousand (10,000) or less, according to the latest federal decennial census, shall not be required to bear the cost and expense of removal and relocation of water and sewer lines and facilities constructed or in place in the rights-of-way of state highways. The cost and expense of such removal and relocation, including any unpaid prior to July 1, 2002, shall be paid by the Department of Transportation;

Municipal public sewer systems and municipal gas systems owned by municipalities with a population of ten thousand (10,000) or less, according to the latest federal decennial census, shall not be required to bear the cost and expense of removal and relocation of lines and facilities constructed or in place in the rights-of-way of state highways. The cost and expense of such removal and relocation, including any unpaid prior to July 1, 2003, shall be paid by the Department of Transportation;

To regulate and abandon grade crossings on any road fixed as a part of the state highway system, and whenever the commission, in order to avoid a grade crossing with the railroad, locates or constructs said road on one side of the railroad, the commission shall have the power to abandon and close such grade crossing, and whenever an underpass or overhead bridge is substituted for a grade crossing, the commission shall have power to abandon such grade crossing and any other crossing adjacent thereto. Included in the powers herein granted shall be the power to require the railroad at grade crossings, where any road of the state highway system crosses the same, to place signal posts with lights or other warning devices at such crossings at the expense of the railroad, and to regulate and abandon underpass or overhead bridges and, where abandoned because of the construction of a new underpass or overhead bridge, to close such old underpass or overhead bridge, or, in its discretion, to return the same to the jurisdiction of the county board of supervisors;

To make proper and reasonable rules and regulations to control the cutting or opening of the road surfaces for subsurface installations;

To make proper and reasonable rules and regulations for the removal from the public rights-of-way of any form of obstruction, to cooperate in improving their appearance, and to prescribe minimum clearance heights for seed conveyors, pipes, passageways or other structure of private or other ownership above the highways;

To establish, and have the Transportation Department maintain and operate, and to cooperate with the state educational institutions in establishing, enlarging, maintaining and operating a laboratory or laboratories for testing materials and for other proper highway purposes;

To provide, under the direction and with the approval of the Department of Finance and Administration, suitable offices, shops and barns in the City of Jackson;

To establish and have enforced set-back regulations;

To cooperate with proper state authorities in producing limerock for highway purposes and to purchase same at cost;

To provide for the purchase of necessary equipment and vehicles and to provide for the repair and housing of same, to acquire by gift, purchase, condemnation or otherwise, land or lands and buildings in fee simple, and to authorize the Transportation Department to construct, lease or otherwise provide necessary and proper permanent district offices for the construction and maintenance divisions of the department, and for the repair and housing of the equipment and vehicles of the department; however, in each Supreme Court district only two (2) permanent district offices shall be set up, but a permanent status shall not be given to any such offices until so provided by act of the Legislature and in the meantime, all shops of the department shall be retained at their present location. As many local or subdistrict offices, shops or barns may be provided as is essential and proper to economical maintenance of the state highway system;

To cooperate with the Department of Archives and History in having placed and maintained suitable historical markers, including those which have been approved and purchased by the State Historical Commission, along state highways, and to have constructed and maintained roadside driveways for convenience and safety in viewing them when necessary;

To cooperate, in its discretion, with the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks in planning and constructing roadside parks upon the right-of-way of state highways, whether constructed, under construction, or planned; said parks to utilize where practical barrow pits used in construction of state highways for use as fishing ponds. Said parks shall be named for abundant flora and fauna existing in the area or for the first flora or fauna found on the site;

Unless otherwise prohibited by law, to make such contracts and execute such instruments containing such reasonable and necessary appropriate terms, provisions and conditions as in its absolute discretion it may deem necessary, proper or advisable, for the purpose of obtaining or securing financial assistance, grants or loans from the United States of America or any department or agency thereof, including contracts with several counties of the state pertaining to the expenditure of such funds;

To cooperate with the Federal Highway Administration in the matter of location, construction and maintenance of the Great River Road, to expend such funds paid to the commission by the Federal Highway Administration or other federal agency, and to authorize the Transportation Department to erect suitable signs marking this highway, the cost of such signs to be paid from state highway funds other than earmarked construction funds;

To cooperate, in its discretion, with the Mississippi Forestry Commission and the School of Forestry, Mississippi State University, in a forestry management program, including planting, thinning, cutting and selling, upon the right-of-way of any highway, constructed, acquired or maintained by the Transportation Department, and to sell and dispose of any and all growing timber standing, lying or being on any right-of-way acquired by the commission for highway purposes in the future; such sale or sales to be made in accordance with the sale of personal property which has become unnecessary for public use as provided for in Section 65-1-123, Mississippi Code of 1972;

To expend funds in cooperation with the Division of Plant Industry, Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce, the United States government or any department or agency thereof, or with any department or agency of this state, to control, suppress or eradicate serious insect pests, rodents, plant parasites and plant diseases on the state highway rights-of-way;

To provide for the placement, erection and maintenance of motorist services business signs and supports within state highway rights-of-way in accordance with current state and federal laws and regulations governing the placement of traffic control devices on state highways, and to establish and collect reasonable fees from the businesses having information on such signs;

To request and to accept the use of persons convicted of an offense, whether a felony or a misdemeanor, for work on any road construction, repair or other project of the Transportation Department. The commission is also authorized to request and to accept the use of persons who have not been convicted of an offense but who are required to fulfill certain court-imposed conditions pursuant to Section 41-29-150(d)(1) or 99-15-26, Mississippi Code of 1972, or the Pretrial Intervention Act, being Sections 99-15-101 through 99-15-127, Mississippi Code of 1972. The commission is authorized to enter into any agreements with the Department of Corrections, the State Parole Board, any criminal court of this state, and any other proper official regarding the working, guarding, safekeeping, clothing and subsistence of such persons performing work for the Transportation Department. Such persons shall not be deemed agents, employees or involuntary servants of the Transportation Department while performing such work or while going to and from work or other specified areas;

To provide for the administration of the railroad revitalization program pursuant to Section 57-43-1 et seq.;

The Mississippi Transportation Commission is further authorized, in its discretion, to expend funds for the purchase of service pins for employees of the Mississippi Transportation Department;

To cooperate with the State Tax Commission by providing for weight enforcement field personnel to collect and assess taxes, fees and penalties and to perform all duties as required pursuant to Section 27-55-501 et seq., Sections 27-19-1 et seq., 27-55-1 et seq., 27-59-1 et seq. and 27-61-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, with regard to vehicles subject to the jurisdiction of the Office of Weight Enforcement. All collections and assessments shall be transferred daily to the State Tax Commission;

The Mississippi Transportation Commission may delegate the authority to enter into a supplemental agreement to a contract previously approved by the commission if the supplemental agreement involves an additional expenditure not to exceed One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00);

The Mississippi Transportation Commission, in its discretion, may enter into agreements with any county, municipality, county transportation commission, business, corporation, partnership, association, individual or other legal entity, for the purpose of accelerating the completion date of scheduled highway construction projects.

Such an agreement may permit the cost of a highway construction project to be advanced to the commission by a county, municipality, county transportation commission, business, corporation, partnership, association, individual or other legal entity, and repaid to such entity by the commission when highway construction funds become available; provided, however, that repayment of funds advanced to the Mississippi Transportation Commission shall be made no sooner than the commission’s identified projected revenue schedule for funding of that particular construction project, and no other scheduled highway construction project established by statute or by the commission may be delayed by an advanced funding project authorized under this paragraph (z). Repayments to a private entity that advances funds to the Mississippi Transportation Commission under this paragraph (z) may not include interest or other fees or charges, and the total amount repaid shall not exceed the total amount of funds advanced to the commission by the entity.

In considering whether to enter into such an agreement, the commission shall consider the availability of financial resources, the effect of such agreement on other ongoing highway construction, the urgency of the public’s need for swift completion of the project and any other relevant factors.

Such an agreement shall be executed only upon a finding by the commission, spread upon its minutes, that the acceleration of the scheduled project is both feasible and beneficial. The commission shall also spread upon its minutes its findings with regard to the factors required to be considered pursuant to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (z);

The Mississippi Transportation Commission, in its discretion, may purchase employment practices liability insurance, and may purchase an excess policy to cover catastrophic losses incurred under the commission’s self-insured workers’ compensation program authorized under Section 71-3-5. Such policies shall be written by the agent or agents of a company or companies authorized to do business in the State of Mississippi. The deductibles shall be in an amount deemed reasonable and prudent by the commission, and the premiums thereon shall be paid from the State Highway Fund. Purchase of insurance under this paragraph shall not serve as an actual or implied waiver of sovereign immunity or of any protection afforded the commission under the Mississippi Tort Claims Act;

The Mississippi Transportation Commission is further authorized, in its discretion, to expend funds for the purchase of promotional materials for safety purposes, highway beautification purposes and recruitment purposes;

To lease antenna space on communication towers which it owns;

To receive funds from the Southeastern Association of Transportation Officials and from other nonstate sources and expend those funds for educational scholarships in transportation related fields of study. The commission may adopt rules or regulations as necessary for the implementation of the program. A strict accounting shall be made of all funds deposited with the commission and all funds dispersed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 395, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 305, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 495, § 32; Laws, 1985, ch. 474, § 55; Laws, 1986, ch. 438, § 46; Laws, 1987, ch. 483, § 47; Laws, 1988, ch. 442, § 44; Laws, 1989, ch. 537, § 42; Laws, 1990, ch. 377, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 518, § 43; Laws, 1991, ch. 530, § 9; Laws, 1991, ch. 618, § 43; Laws, 1992, ch. 491 § 45; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 5; Laws, 1994, ch. 491, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 461, § 45; Laws, 2000, ch. 474, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 325 , § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 556, § 6; Laws, 2003, ch. 354, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 457, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 463, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 564, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 562, § 3; Laws, 2005, ch. 306, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 468, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 26, 2013).

§ 65-1-8.1.
Commission may allow for erection of welcome and recognition signs adjacent to state highways within unincorporated areas of a county.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission may allow for the erection of welcome, recognition and acknowledgement signs that are adjacent to state highways within an unincorporated area of a county and maintained by public officers or elected officials of counties while carrying out an official duty or responsibility. The local jurisdiction shall be required to purchase and pay the cost of maintaining such signs which shall conform to the requirements of similar signs that are placed by incorporated areas in accordance with rules adopted by the commission and the Mississippi Department of Transportation. The erection of welcome, recognition and acknowledgment signs in areas on or adjacent to freeways or interstate highways is prohibited.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 401, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-1-8.2.
Commission may allow erection of certain signs for member institutions of the Mississippi Association of Independent Colleges and Universities; institution must purchase and pay the costs of erecting and maintaining signs.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission may allow for the erection of signs for member institutions of the Mississippi Association of Independent Colleges and Universities that display the name and emblem of such institutions that are similar to signs erected for public state institutions of higher learning. The institutions for which the signs are erected shall be required to purchase and pay the cost of erecting and maintaining such signs which shall conform to the requirements of similar signs that are erected for public state institutions of higher learning.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 401, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-1-9.
Executive Director of Department of Transportation.

The commission shall appoint an executive director of the Mississippi Department of Transportation for a term of office beginning on April 1, 1993. The person serving as Executive Director of the State Highway Department on June 30, 1992, shall serve until April 1, 1993, as the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Transportation, and thereafter shall be eligible for reappointment to the position of Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Transportation. Succeeding terms shall expire on April 1 each four (4) years thereafter. The Executive Director may be removed by a majority of the commission pursuant to Section 25-9-101 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972. All appointments by the commission shall be with the advice and consent of the Senate. The commission shall submit its appointment to the Senate not later than March 1 of the year in which a term expires, and if such submission is not made by March 1, the incumbent director shall be deemed to have been reappointed for a four-year term. In the event a vacancy occurs from resignation, death or removal from office by the commission, the commission shall submit its appointment for the unexpired term to the Senate not later than the next March 1 after such vacancy occurs. If no appointment for an unexpired term is submitted to the Senate, the Governor shall make such appointment not later than April 1 of such year. The commission shall fix the compensation of the Executive Director, subject to approval by the State Personnel Board. The Executive Director shall be eligible for reappointment. The Executive Director shall have the following qualifications:

Possess a wide knowledge of the transportation system and needs of Mississippi;

Possess a wide knowledge of the principles of transportation organization and administration; and

Possess selected training or expertise in the field of transportation.

No person who is a member of the Mississippi Transportation Commission, or who has been a member of the Transportation Commission or of its predecessor, the State Highway Commission, within two (2) years next preceding his appointment, shall be eligible to be chosen as Executive Director of the department. The executive director shall be the executive officer of the commission and shall be subject to its orders and directions. The executive director shall give his entire time to the duties of his office. Before entering upon the duties of his office, the executive director shall give bond to the State of Mississippi in the sum of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), conditioned upon the faithful discharge and performance of his official duty. The principal and surety on such bond shall be liable thereunder to the state for double the amount of value of any money or property which the state may lose, if any, by reason of any wrongful or criminal act of the executive director. Such bond, when approved by the commission, shall be filed with the Secretary of State, and the premium thereon shall be paid from any funds available to the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4990; 1942, § 8015; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 2; Laws, 1977, ch. 350; Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 3; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1992.